Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2424
Rules and regulations.

The Nebraska State Patrol shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 69-2401 to 69-2425.

Laws 1991, LB 355, § 23;

Laws 1996, LB 1055, § 9.